Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1310
Arbitration costs and expenses; how assessed.

Each of the parties to the dispute shall pay the costs and expenses of the arbitrator selected by it together with one-half of the costs and expenses of the third arbitrator and one-half of the costs and expenses of the hearing, unless the parties otherwise agree or the arbitration board, in its discretion, assesses such costs and expenses, or any part thereof, in a different manner.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 10.